Louisiana, session 2026, HB334.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1553(G) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1553. Noncharging of benefits; recoupment; social charge account; social charge
tax rate
* * *
G. The Incumbent Worker Training Program reauthorization shall be
expressly renewed by the legislature prior to July 1, 2026 2030, in order for amounts
to be charged and credited to the Incumbent Worker Training Account in the
following calendar year for use in funding the program.
Section 2. Pursuant to R.S. 49:193, Louisiana Works and the statutory entities made
a part of the department by law shall be re-created effective June 30, 2026, and all statutory
authority therefor is continued in accordance with the provisions of Part XII of Chapter 1 of
Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 3. All statutory authority for the existence of Louisiana Works and the
statutory entities made a part of the department as re-created by Section 2 of this Act shall
cease as of July 1, 2031, pursuant to R.S. 49:191. However, Louisiana Works may be re-
created prior to such date in accordance with the provisions of Part XII of Chapter 1 of Title
49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 334 ENROLLED
Section 4. The provisions of R.S. 49:193 are hereby superseded to the extent that
those provisions are in conflict with the provisions of this Act.
Section 5. R.S. 49:191(3)(b) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§191. Termination of legislative authority for existence of statutory entities; phase-
out period for statutory entities; table of dates
Notwithstanding any termination dates set by any previous Act of the
legislature, the statutory entities set forth in this Section shall begin to terminate their
operations on July first of each of the following years, and all legislative authority
for the existence of any statutory entity, as defined in R.S. 49:190, shall cease as of
July first of the following year, which shall be the termination date:
* * *
(3) July 1, 2030:
* * *
(b) Louisiana Works and all statutory entities made a part of the department
by law.
* * *
Section 6. R.S. 49:191(1)(f) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 7. This Act shall become effective on June 30, 2026; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
June 30, 2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.